Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1111
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all children in the State of Nebraska, regardless of physical or mental capacity, are entitled to a meaningful educational program.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3302;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 793.